Montana, session 2025, HB910.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 16-11-102, MCA, is amended to read:
"16-11-102. Definitions. (1) As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply, unless the context
requires otherwise:
(a) "Contraband" means:
(i) any tobacco product possessed, sold, offered for sale, distributed, held, owned, acquired,
transported, imported, or caused to be imported in violation of this part;
(ii) any cigarette or roll-your-own tobacco that is possessed, sold, offered for sale, distributed,
held, owned, acquired, transported, imported, or caused to be imported in violation of part 4 or 5;
(iii) any cigarettes that bear trademarks that are counterfeit under state or federal trademark laws;
(iv) any cigarettes bearing false or counterfeit insignia or tax stamps from any state; or
(v) any cigarettes or tobacco products that violate 16-10-306.
(b) "Department" means the department of revenue provided for in 2-15-1301.
(c) "Person" means an individual, firm, partnership, corporation, association, company, committee,
other group of persons, or other business entity, however formed.
(2) As used in this part, the following definitions apply, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Cigarette" means any product that contains nicotine, is intended to be burned or heated under
ordinary conditions of use, and consists of or contains:
(i) any roll of tobacco wrapped in paper or in any substance not containing tobacco;
(ii) tobacco, in any form, that is functional in the product and that, because of its appearance, the
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 910

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0910.2
type of tobacco used in the filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to or purchased by
consumers as a cigarette; or
(iii) any roll of tobacco wrapped in any substance containing tobacco that, because of its
appearance or the type of tobacco used in the filler and regardless of its packaging and labeling, is likely to be
offered to or purchased by consumers as a cigarette described in subsection (2)(a)(i).
(b) "Controlling person" means a person who owns an equity interest of 10% or more of a business
or the equivalent.
(c) "Directory" means the tobacco product directory as provided in 16-11-504.
(d) "Full face value of insignia" means the total amount of the tax levied under this part.
(e) "Insignia" or "indicia" means the impression, mark, or stamp approved by the department under
the provisions of this part.
(f) "Licensed retailer" means any person, other than a wholesaler, subjobber, or tobacco product
vendor, who is licensed under the provisions of this part.
(g) "Licensed subjobber" means a subjobber licensed under the provisions of this part. The person
must be treated as a wholesaler.
(h) "Licensed wholesaler" means a wholesaler licensed under the provisions of this part.
(i) "Manufacturer" means any person who fabricates tobacco products from raw materials for the
purpose of resale.
(j) "Manufacturer's original container" means the original master shipping case or original shipping
case used by the tobacco product manufacturer to ship multipack units, such as boxes, cartons, and sleeves, to
warehouse distribution points.
(k) "Moist snuff" means any finely cut, ground, or powdered tobacco, other than dry snuff, that is
intended to be placed in the oral cavity.
(l) (i) "Premium cigar" means any roll of tobacco that is hand wrapped in 100% whole tobacco
leaf, is not wrapped by a machine, and does not contain a filter, tip, or any characterizing nontobacco flavor.
(ii) The term does not include a cigarette.
(m) "Record" means an original document, a legible facsimile, or an electronically preserved copy.
(n) "Retailer" means a person, other than a wholesaler, who is engaged in the business of selling
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 910

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0910.2
tobacco products to the ultimate consumer. The term includes a person who operates fewer than 10 tobacco
product vending machines.
(o) "Roll-your-own tobacco" means any tobacco that, because of its appearance, type, packaging,
or labeling, is suitable for use and likely to be offered to or purchased by consumers as tobacco for making
cigarettes.
(p) "Sale" or "sell" means any transfer of tobacco products for consideration, exchange, barter, gift,
offer for sale, or distribution in any manner or by any means.
(q) "Sole distributor" means a person who either causes a unique brand of tobacco products to be
manufactured according to distinctive specifications and acts as the exclusive distributor of the tobacco
products or is the exclusive distributor of a brand of tobacco products within the continental United States.
(r) "Subjobber" means a person who purchases from a licensed wholesaler cigarettes with the
Montana cigarette tax insignia affixed and sells or offers to sell tobacco products to a licensed retailer or
tobacco product vendor. An isolated sale or exchange of cigarettes between licensed retailers does not
constitute those retailers as subjobbers.

(s) (i) "Tobacco product" means : cigarettes and all other products containing tobacco that are

(A) a product containing, made, or derived from tobacco or that contains nicotine that is intended
for human consumption or use i s likely to be consumed, whether smoked, heated, chewed, absorbed,
dissolved, inhaled, or ingested by any other means, including but not limited to a cigarette, a cigar, pipe
tobacco, chewing tobacco, snuff, and snus; and

(B) any substance, regardless of whether or not it contains nicotine, consumed during the use of a
device that can be used to deliver nicotine or another substance in any form, including aerosolized or
vaporized, to the person inhaling from the device, including but not limited to an e-cigarette, e-cigar, e-pipe,
vape pen, or e-hookah.
(ii) The term does not include:

- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 910

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0910.2
(A) drugs, devices, or combination products, as defined in the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic
Act, authorized by the United States food and drug administration for sale as a tobacco cessation product or for
other therapeutic purposes when the product is marketed and sold solely for such an approved purpose; or

(B) filters, rolling papers, pipes, or a device described in subsection (2)(s)(i)(B) ..
(S) "TOBACCO PRODUCT" MEANS:
(I) CIGARETTES AND ALL OTHER PRODUCTS CONTAINING TOBACCO THAT ARE INTENDED FOR HUMAN
CONSUMPTION OR USE; OR
(JJ) VAPOR PRODUCTS.
(t) (i) "Tobacco product vendor" means a person doing business in the state who purchases
tobacco products through a wholesaler, subjobber, or retailer for 10 or more tobacco product vending machines
that the person operates for a profit in premises or locations other than the person's own.
(ii) A tobacco product vendor must be treated as a wholesaler.
(U) (I) "VAPOR PRODUCT" MEANS A NONCOMBUSTIBLE PRODUCT THAT MAY CONTAIN NICOTINE AND THAT
USES A HEATING ELEMENT, POWER SOURCE, ELECTRONIC CIRCUIT, OR OTHER ELECTRONIC, CHEMICAL, OR MECHANICAL
MEANS, REGARDLESS OF SHAPE OR SIZE, TO PRODUCE VAPOR FROM A SOLUTION OR OTHER SUBSTANCE. THE TERM
INCLUDES AN ELECTRONIC CIGARETTE, ELECTRONIC CIGAR, ELECTRONIC CIGARILLO, ELECTRONIC PIPE, OR SIMILAR
PRODUCT OR DEVICE AND A VAPOR CARTRIDGE OR OTHER CONTAINER THAT MAY CONTAIN NICOTINE IN A SOLUTION OR
OTHER FORM THAT IS INTENDED TO BE USED WITH OR IN AN ELECTRONIC CIGARETTE, ELECTRONIC CIGAR, ELECTRONIC
CIGARILLO, ELECTRONIC PIPE, OR SIMILAR PRODUCT OR DEVICE.
(II) THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE A PRODUCT REGULATED AS A DRUG OR DEVICE BY THE UNITED STATES
FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION UNDER CHAPTER V OF THE FEDERAL FOOD, DRUG, AND COSMETIC ACT.
(u) (V) "Wholesale price" means the established price for which a manufacturer sells a tobacco
product to a wholesaler or any other person before any discount or reduction.
(v) (W) "Wholesaler" means a person who:
(i) purchases tobacco products from a manufacturer for the purpose of selling tobacco products to
subjobbers, tobacco product vendors, wholesalers, or retailers; or
(ii) purchases tobacco products from a sole distributor, another wholesaler, or any other person for
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 910

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0910.2
the purpose of selling tobacco products to subjobbers, tobacco product vendors, wholesalers, or retailers."

SECTION 2. Section 16-11-111, MCA, is amended to read:
"16-11-111. Cigarette, tobacco products, and moist snuff sales tax -- exemption for sale to
tribal member. (1) (a) A tax on the purchase of cigarettes for consumption, use, or any purpose other than
resale in the regular course of business is imposed and must be precollected by the wholesaler and paid to the
state of Montana. The tax is $1.70 on each package containing 20 cigarettes. Whenever packages contain
other than 20 cigarettes, there is a tax on each cigarette equal to 1/20 the tax on a package containing 20
cigarettes.
(b) The tax computed under subsection (1)(a) applies to illegally packaged cigarettes under 16-11-
307.
(2) The tax imposed in subsection (1) does not apply to quota cigarettes.
(3) Subject to the refund or credit provided in subsection (4), the tax must be precollected on all
cigarettes entering a Montana Indian reservation.
(4) Pursuant to the procedure provided in subsection (5), a wholesaler making a sale of cigarettes
to a retailer within the boundaries of a Montana Indian reservation may apply to the department for a refund or
credit for taxes precollected on cigarettes sold by the retailer to a member of the federally recognized Indian
tribe or tribes on whose reservation the sale is made. A wholesaler who does not file a claim within 1 year of the
shipment date forfeits the refund or credit.
(5) The distribution of tax-free cigarettes to a tribal member must be implemented through a
system of preapproved wholesaler shipments. A licensed Montana wholesaler shall contact the department for
approval prior to the shipment of the untaxed cigarettes. The department may authorize sales based on
whether the quota, as established in a cooperative agreement between the department and an Indian tribe or
as set out in this chapter, has been met. If authorized as a tax-exempt sale, the wholesaler, upon providing
proof of order and delivery to a retailer within the boundaries of a Montana Indian reservation selling cigarettes
to members of a federally recognized tribe or tribes of that reservation, must be given a refund or credit. Once
the quota has been filled, the department shall immediately notify all affected wholesalers that further sales on
that reservation must be taxed and that a claim for a refund or credit will not be honored for the remainder of
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 910

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0910.2
the quota period. Quota allocations are not transferable between quota periods or between reservations.
(6) The total amount of refunds or credits allowed by the department to all wholesalers claiming the
refund or credit under subsection (4) for any month may not exceed an amount that is equal to the tax due on
the quota allocation. The department shall determine the amount of refunds or credits for each Indian
reservation at the beginning of each fiscal year, using the most recent census data available from the bureau of
Indian affairs or as provided in a cooperative agreement with the tribe or tribes of the Indian reservation.
(7) There must be collected and paid to the state of Montana a tax of 50% of the wholesale price,
to the wholesaler, of all tobacco products other than cigarettes, premium cigars, vapor products, and moist
snuff. The tax on a premium cigar is the lesser of 50% of the wholesale price or 35 cents a premium cigar. The
tax on moist snuff is 85 cents an ounce based upon the net weight of the package listed by the manufacturer.
For packages of moist snuff that are less than or greater than 1 ounce, the tax must be proportional to the size
of the package. The tax on vapor products that contain nicotine is 20% of the wholesale price. Tobacco
products shipped from Montana and destined for retail sale and consumption outside the state are not subject
to this tax.
(8) The tax imposed by subsection (7) must be precollected and paid by a wholesaler to the
department upon sale to a Montana retailer. A wholesaler who fails to report or pay the tax required by this part
must be assessed penalty and interest as provided in 15-1-216.
(9) A retailer who purchases tobacco products for resale on which the tobacco products tax has
not been collected and paid to the department shall comply with all the provisions of this part and the rules
adopted to implement this part as if it were a wholesaler.
(10) A retailer must assume that the tobacco products tax has not been collected and paid to the
department in the absence of a statement on the retailer's invoice or sales slip for the tobacco products that
states that the applicable Montana tobacco products tax is included in the total billing cost."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Applicability. [This act] applies to tobacco products sold by wholesalers
after June 30, 2025.
- END -
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 910